Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-625
Person, defined.

Person means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, governmental agency, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 387.